Utah statutes.
31A-22-106.   Petition of fiduciary's surety to be relieved from liability.
Any surety securing others against losses caused by breach of duty by a
fiduciary, herein called "principal," may petition the court where the
surety's obligation is filed or which has jurisdiction over the principal, for
an order relieving the surety from further liability for the acts or omissions
of the principal.  This order may be issued only after the court is satisfied
that the principal has accounted to the petitioner and has obtained a new
surety.  The surety relieved from liability shall refund any unearned part of
the premium paid which the surety held as consideration for its promise to be
surety. To relieve a surety from liability, the court may order the principal
to account, to obtain a new surety, or to refrain from acting except to
preserve property held in a fiduciary capacity.
